Georgia, session 2025_26, HB17.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Valvular Heart Health and Sudden Cardiac
Death Prevention Act."
H. B. 17
- 1 -

LC 52 0614
SECTION 2.
Chapter 1 of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions regarding health, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"31-1-26.
(a) The department shall implement projects to increase education on and public awareness
of valvular heart disease, enhance the diagnosis and treatment of valvular heart disease, and
reduce the incidence of sudden cardiac death caused by valvular heart disease. Such
projects may be implemented by the department directly or through the award of grants or
contracts to public or nonprofit private entities. The department may provide technical
assistance with respect to the planning, development, and operation of such projects
directly or through such awards.
(b) The projects provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section may include projects
to initiate, increase, or improve:
(1) Education on and public awareness of the risk factors, symptoms, and public health
consequences of valvular heart disease;
(2) Diagnostic capabilities of physicians and other healthcare providers regarding
valvular heart disease and access to treatment for individuals with valvular heart disease;
and
(3) Surveillance programs to analyze and report on out-of-hospital cardiac arrests related
to valvular heart disease to improve patient outcomes.
(c) In awarding grants or contracts for projects pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code
section, the department shall give priority to projects that target populations most impacted
by valvular heart disease or that address health disparities in the risk factors, treatment, and
outcomes of valvular heart disease based on race, ethnicity, gender, and socioeconomic
status.
H. B. 17
- 2 -

LC 52 0614
(d) The department shall ensure that projects implemented pursuant to this Code section
are coordinated, as appropriate, with other state agencies that carry out activities regarding
valvular heart disease.
(e) The department shall:
(1) Collect and analyze the findings of research conducted with respect to valvular heart
disease; and
(2) Publish on the department's public website best practices for physicians and other
healthcare providers who provide care to individuals diagnosed with valvular heart
disease. Such information shall also be annually distributed by the Georgia Composite
Medical Board to all physicians licensed to practice medicine in this state."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 17
- 3 -